Hawaii, session 2025, GM1391.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The purpose of this Act is to make the State's
property forfeiture process more just by:
(1) Increasing transparency and accountability surrounding
property forfeiture;
(2) Clarifying which property is subject to forfeiture;
(3) Amending the authorized disposition of forfeited
property and the proceeds thereof;
(4) Requiring the attorney general to adopt rules
necessary to carry out the purpose of the Hawaii
Omnibus Criminal Forfeiture Act; and
(5) Repealing language that requires the Hawaii Omnibus
Criminal Forfeiture Act to be construed liberally.
SECTION 2. Chapter 712A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding two new sections to be appropriately
designated and to read as follows:
2025-3288 HB126 CDl HMSO
iniiiiiiiiniHniiiii

Page 2 H.B. NO. “
i
C.D. 1
"§712A- Records of seized or forfeited property. (1)
Each seizing agency shall maintain the following records for all
property seized for purposes of forfeiture:
(a) The authority under which the property was seized or
forfeited;
(b) The date on which each item of property was seized or
forfeited;
(c) The department or agency that has possession of the
seized or forfeited property;
(d) A description of each item of seized or forfeited
property; and
(e) The estimated value of each item of seized or
forfeited property.
(2) The seizing agency shall:
(a) Maintain all records of seized or forfeited property;
(b) Make the records open to inspection; and
(c) Post the records on a publicly accessible website.
§712A- Equitable sharing program; restrictions.
Notwithstanding the provisions of section 712A-7, a seizing
agency or prosecuting attorney shall not enter into an agreement
to transfer or refer property seized under section 712A-6 to a
2025-3288 HB126 GDI HMSO 2

Page 3
H.B. NO.
S.D. 2
C.D. 1
federal agency directly, indirectly, through adoption, through
an intergovernmental joint task force, or by any other means
that would circumvent the provisions of this chapter, unless the
seized property includes United States currency in excess of
$100,000."
SECTION 3. Section 712A-5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows;
"§712A-5 Property subject to forfeiture; exemption. (1)
The following [is] shall be subject to forfeiture:
(a) Property described in a statute authorizing
forfeiture;
(b) Property used or intended for use in the commission
of, attempt to commit, or conspiracy to commit a
covered offense, or [whieh] that facilitated or
assisted [sueh] the activity;
(c) Any firearm [whieh] that is subject to forfeiture
under any other subsection of this section or [whieh]
that is carried during, visible, or used in
furtherance of the commission, attempt to commit, or
conspiracy to commit a covered offense, or any firearm
2025-3288 HB126 CDl HMSO 3

Page 4 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
found in proximity to contraband or to
instrumentalities of an offense;
(d) Contraband or untaxed cigarettes in violation of
chapter 245, shall be seized and summarily forfeited
to the State without regard to the procedures set
forth in this chapter;
(e) Any proceeds or other property acquired, maintained,
or produced by means of or as a result of the
commission of the covered offense;
(f) Any property derived from any proceeds [whiefe] that
were obtained directly or indirectly from the
commission of a covered offense;
(g) Any interest in, security of, claim against, or
property or contractual right of any kind affording a
source of influence over any enterprise [wliieh] that
has been established, participated in, operated,
controlled, or conducted in order to commit a covered
offense; and
(h) All books, records, bank statements, accounting
records, microfilms, tapes, computer data, or other
data [which] that are used, intended for use, or
2025-3288 HB126 CDl HMSO

Page 5 H.B. NO.
-1
C.D. 1
[whieh] that facilitated or assisted in the commission
of a covered offense, or [which] that document the use
of the proceeds of a covered offense.
[-(-2-)-----Except that!
-(-a-hj (2) Real property, or an interest therein, may be
forfeited under the provisions of this chapter only in
cases in which the covered offense is chargeable as a
felony offense under state law[-^]_^
(3) The following limitations shall apply to the
forfeiture of property under this chapter; provided that nothing
in this subsection shall be construed to prevent the seizure of
property before conviction pursuant to section 712A-6:
[-(M-l (a) No property shall be forfeited under this chapter
[to the extent of an interest of--an—owner-,- ] by reason
of [any act or omission established—b-y-^hat owner- to
have- been committed or ontitted wi-t-hout-the knowledge
end—eensent^-e^—that—owners 1 the commission of any
covered offense unless the owner has received a charge
for the covered offense. If no such charge is filed
within one year from the date of seizure, all property
seized shall be returned to the legal owner, as
2025-3288 HB126 GDI HMSO

Page 6
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
determined by the department or agency in possession
of the property, one year from the date of seizure;
provided that property that is contraband or otherwise
unlawful shall not be returned and shall be disposed
of pursuant to rules adopted by the attorney general;
provided further that if the legal owner cannot be
determined or located, the department or agency in
possession of the property shall follow procedures set
forth in rules adopted by the attorney general to
determine or locate the owner;
(b)^ No property shall be forfeited under this chapter by
reason of any act or omission established by the owner
to have been committed or omitted without the
knowledge and consent of the owner;
(c) No conveyance used by any person as a common carrier
in the transaction of a business as a common carrier
[ire] shall be subject to forfeiture under this section
unless it appears that the owner or other person in
charge of the conveyance is a consenting party or
privy to a violation of this chapter;
2025—3288 HB126 CDl HMSO 6
iiiniiiMHiiiNMnii

Page 7 H.B. NO.
I . . I . g 2
C.D. 1
(d) No conveyance [is] shall be subject to forfeiture
under this section by reason of any act or omission
established by the owner thereof to have been
committed or omitted without the owner's knowledge or
consent; and
(e) A forfeiture of a conveyance encumbered by a bona fide
security interest [is] shall be subject to the
interest of the secured party if the secured party
neither had knowledge of nor consented to the act or
omission.
(4) This chapter shall not apply to the forfeiture of an
animal pursuant to section 711-1109.2.
(5) This section shall not prohibit or restrict
forfeitures authorized by law other than this chapter.”
SECTION 4. Section 712A-11, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (10) to read as follows:
" (10) All property, including all interest in such
property, declared forfeited under this chapter vests in this
State on the commission of the act or omission giving rise to
forfeiture under this chapter together with the proceeds of the
property after the act or omission. Any property or proceeds
2025-3288 HB126 CDl HMSO 7

Page 8 H.B. NO. gi
C.D. 1
transferred to any person after the act or omission are subject
to forfeiture and thereafter shall be ordered forfeited unless
the transferee claims and establishes in a hearing pursuant to
this chapter the showings set out in section 712A-5(2)[—] and

SECTION 5. Section 712A-16, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
'’§712A-16 Disposition of property forfeited. (1) All
property forfeited to the State under this chapter shall be
transferred to the attorney general_^ who [^] may:
[-(a^ May transfer property,—other than curreney,—whieh
shall bo distributed in accordanee-with subsection—124-
to any local or state government entity,—municipality,
eftfer^eemefttr-ageftey—withifi—the—frtafee-?-
-(hh May sett] (a) Sell forfeited property to the public
by public sale; provided that for leasehold real
property:
(i) The attorney general shall first offer the holder
of the immediate reversionary interest the right
to acquire the leasehold interest and any
improvements built or paid for by the lessee for
2025-3288 HB126 CDl HMSO 8

Page 9 H.B. NO.
Hri
C.D. 1
the then fair market value of the leasehold
interest and improvements. The holder of the
immediate reversionary interest shall have thirty
days after receiving written notice within which
to accept or reject the offer in writing;
provided that the offer shall be deemed to be
rejected if the holder of the immediate
reversionary interest has not communicated
acceptance to the attorney general within the
thirty-day period. The holder of the immediate
reversionary interest shall have thirty days
after acceptance to tender to the attorney
general the purchase price for the leasehold
interest and any improvements, upon which tender
the leasehold interest and improvements shall be
conveyed to the holder of the immediate
reversionary interest[—]£
(ii) If the holder of the immediate reversionary
interest fails to exercise the right of first
refusal provided in subparagraph (i), the
attorney general may proceed to sell the
2025-3288 HB126 CDl HMSO 9

Page 10 H.B. NO.
^01
g □ 2
C.D. 1
leasehold interest and any improvements by public
sale[—]; and
(iii) Any dispute between the attorney general and the
holder of the immediate reversionary interest as
to the fair market value of the leasehold
interest and improvements shall be settled by
arbitration pursuant to chapter 658A;
[4^ May sell] (b) Sell or destroy all raw materials,
products, and equipment of any kind used or intended
for use in manufacturing, compounding, or processing a
controlled substance or any untaxed cigarettes in
violation of chapter 245;
[-(-d)- May--e0mpromioc] (c) Compromise and pay valid claims
against property forfeited pursuant to this chapter;
or
May make] (d) Make any other disposition of forfeited
property authorized by law.
(2) All forfeited property and the sale proceeds thereof[-r
up-to—a maximum of three million dollars-per year,—net
previously transferred pursuant to—[subsection]—(1) (a)—ef-lshis
2025-3288 HB126 CDl HMSO 10

Page 11 HI .. B. N'I O.
hbi
g 2
C.D. 1
Goetion,- ] shall, after payment of expenses of administration and
sale, be distributed or retained as follows:
(a) One quarter shall be distributed to the unit or units
of state or local government law enforcement
[-{•] whose [4-] officers or employees conducted the
investigation and caused the arrest of the person
whose property was forfeited or seizure of the
property for forfeiture;
(b) One quarter shall be distributed to the prosecuting
attorney who instituted the action producing the
forfeiture; and
(c) One half shall be [dopooitcd into] retained in the
criminal forfeiture fund established by this chapter.
(3) [-Property] All property and money distributed to units
of state [aftd] or local government pursuant to subsection (2)(a)
and (b) shall be used for law enforcement purposes, including
but not limited to drug recognition expert training and public
awareness or outreach efforts, and shall complement but not
supplant the funds regularly appropriated for [-sweh] these
purposes.
2025-3288 HB126 CDl HMSO 11

Page 12 HI ■ .. B. NI O. “
g 21
C.D. 1
(4) There [is] shall be established in the department of
the attorney general a special fund to be known as the criminal
forfeiture fund[7—hereinafter rcforrod to as the—fund" in] into
which shall be deposited [one-half of] the proceeds of a
forfeiture and any penalties paid pursuant to section 712A-
10(6). All moneys in the criminal forfeiture fund except for
those disbursements provided for in subsection (2)(a) and (b)
shall be expended by the attorney general and are hereby
appropriated for the following purposes:
(a) The payment of any expenses necessary to seize,
detain, appraise, inventory, safeguard, maintain,
advertise, or sell property seized, detained, or
forfeited pursuant to this chapter or of any other
necessary expenses incident to the seizure, detention,
or forfeiture of [e-ueh] property and [e^aeh] contract
services and payments to reimburse any federal, state,
or county agency for any expenditures made to perform
the foregoing functions;
[-{fe)- The payment ©f—awards aasiot-anec
loading to a -civil or criminal proceeding;
2025-3288 HB126 CDl HMSO 12
liOliimiNiWIBMHII

Page 13 H.B. NO. “

C.D. 1
-te)- The-payment of suppletnc-ntal oumo to state and county
agoncico—fe-r--law enforcement purpooco;
(b) The payment of expenses arising in connection
with programs for training and education of law
enforcement officers; and
[-(e)-] (c) The payment of expenses arising in connection
with enforcement pursuant to the drug nuisance
abatement unit in the department of the attorney
general.
(5) The attorney general [may,—witheut—regard—te-^fehe
reguireffteftes—ef—ehepter^-9-17—promulgate] shall adopt rules [-and
rcgulationa] necessary to carry out the purpose of this chapter,
including rules concerning the return of seized property, the
disposition of property, the use of the criminal forfeiture
fund, and compromising and paying valid claims against property
forfeited [purouant to this-ehaptcr].
(6) [Not] No less than [-tweftty] forty days [p-ri-or to]
before the convening of each regular session, the attorney
general shall provide to the legislature a report on the use of
the Hawaii omnibus criminal forfeiture act during the fiscal
2025-3288 HB126 CDl HMSO 13
■iiwiiiniiiiiiiiiiiiHi

Page 14 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
year preceding the legislative session. The report shall
include;
(a) The total amount and type of property seized by law
enforcement agencies;
(b) The total number of administrative and judicial
actions filed by prosecuting attorneys and the
disposition thereof [-^] for each action;
(c) The total number of claims or petitions for remission
or mitigation filed in administrative actions and the
dispositions thereof [•#•] for each action;
(d) The total amount and type of property forfeited and
the sale proceeds thereof;
(e) The total amount and type of property distributed to
units of state and local government;
(f) The amount of money deposited into the criminal
forfeiture fund; and
(g) The amount of money expended by the attorney general
from the criminal forfeiture fund under subsection (5)
and the reason for the expenditures."
SECTION 6. Section 712A-19, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
repealed.
2025-3288 HB126 CDl HMSO ;
■HWHiiniiiiiinHi

Page 15
H.B. NO.
hki
C.D. 1
[ "-t^7-3r2A—3r9^ Construction.--I-t—i-o ■ the intent of the
legialnturG that thia chapter be liboral-l-y conatrued oo as t-o
effect the purpooea-of this—chapter]
SECTION 7. This Act does not affect rights and duties that
matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were
begun before its effective date.
SECTION 8. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 9. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2025-3288 HB126 CDl HMSO 15

H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 3rd day of July , 2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 126, HD 1,SD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 126, H.D. 1, S.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘1
Date; April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate
231